Massachusetts, session 194th, H5425.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding Section 17 of Chapter 138 of the General Laws, the
Licensing Authority of the Town of Southborough may grant an additional License for the Sale
of All Alcoholic Beverages not to be drunk on the premises pursuant to said Section 15 of
Chapter 138, to Costco Atlantic Liquors, Inc., located at 21 Coslin Drive, Southborough, MA.
The License shall be subject to all of the Provisions of said Chapter 138, except Section 17
thereof.
SECTION 2. The Licensing Authority shall not approve the transfer of the License to any
other location, but it may grant the License to a new applicant at the same location if the
applicant files with the Licensing Authority a letter from the State Department of Revenue,
indicating that the License is in good standing with the Department, and that all applicable taxes
have been paid.
of 2

SECTION 3. If the License under this Act is cancelled, revoked, or no longer in use, it
shall be physically returned with all legal rights, privileges, and restrictions pertaining thereto, to
the Licensing Authority, which may then grant the License to a new applicant at the same
location, under the same conditions as specified in the Act.
SECTION 4. This action shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2